West Virginia, session 2026, HB4590.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. PROCEDURE. §54-2-16a. Liability for costs and attorney's fees generally. (a) Except as otherwise specially provided, all costs of a condemnation proceeding in the a trial court shall be paid by the applicant. (b) In every condemnation proceeding in an appellate court, costs shall be recovered in such court by the party substantially prevailing.(c) In every condemnation proceeding in a trial court, or an appellate court, a private property owner that substantially prevails in such a proceeding may be awarded reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.